fr: Caractéristiques du sauna facial: Support à hauteur réglable; Chambre d'aromathérapie; Chambre d'infusion aux herbes; Thérapie par lumière LED; Lampe grossissante; Vapeur nano-ionique; Stérilisation à l'ozone; Commandes tactiles; Brume ultrasonique; Autre
nl: Gezichtsstomer functies: Verstelbare hoogtestandaard; Aromatherapiekamer; Kruideninzetfilterkamer; LED-lichttherapie; Vergrotende lamp; Nano-ionische stoom; Ozonsterilisatie; Touchscreenbediening; Ultrasone nevel; Andere
it: Caratteristiche del vaporizzatore facciale: Supporto ad altezza regolabile; Camera per aromaterapia; Camera per infusione di erbe; Terapia con luce LED; Lampada con ingrandimento; Vapore nano ionico; Sterilizzazione con ozono; Controlli touchscreen; Nebbia ultrasonica; Altro
bg-BG: Характеристики на уреда с пара за лице: Стойка с регулируема височина; Камера за ароматерапия; Камера за билкова инфузия; LED светлинна терапия; Увеличителна лампа; Нано йонна пара; Озонова стерилизация; Контроли със сензорен екран; Ултразвукова мъгла; Други
hu: Arcgőzölő jellemzői: Állítható magasságú állvány; Aromaterápiás kamra; Gyógynövény infúziós kamra; LED fényterápia; Nagyító lámpa; Nano ionos gőz; Ózon sterilizálás; Érintőképernyős vezérlés; Ultrahangos köd; Egyéb
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale aparatului de aburi pentru față: Suport cu înălțime ajustabilă; Cameră pentru aromaterapie; Cameră pentru infuzie de plante; Terapie cu lumină LED; Lampă cu lupă; Abur nano-ionic; Sterilizare cu ozon; Controale cu ecran tactil; Ceață ultrasonică; Altele
fi: Kasvojen höyrystimen ominaisuudet: Säädettävä korkuisteline; Aromaterapiakammio; Yrttihaudutuskammio; LED-valoterapia; Suurennuslamppu; Nano-ionihöyry; Otsonidesinfiointi; Kosketusnäyttöohjaimet; Ultraäänisumu; Muu
pl: Cechy parownicy do twarzy: Stojak z regulowaną wysokością; Komora aromaterapii; Komora na napary ziołowe; Terapia światłem LED; Lampa powiększająca; Nano-jonowa para; Sterylizacja ozonem; Sterowanie dotykowe; Mgiełka ultradźwiękowa; Inne
ko: 페이셜 스티머 기능: 높이 조절 스탠드; 아로마테라피 챔버; 허브 인퓨전 챔버; LED 라이트 테라피; 확대 램프; 나노 이온 스팀; 오존 살균; 터치스크린 컨트롤; 초음파 미스트; 기타
sv: Ansiktsångares funktioner: Justerbart höjdställ; Aromterapikammare; Örtinfusionskammare; LED-ljusterapi; Förstoringslampa; Nano-jonisk ånga; Ozonsterilisering; Pekskärmskontroller; Ultraljudsdimma; Övrigt
pt-BR: Recursos do vaporizador facial: Suporte com altura ajustável; Câmara de aromaterapia; Câmara de infusão de ervas; Terapia com luz LED; Lâmpada com lente de aumento; Vapor nano iônico; Esterilização com ozônio; Controles touchscreen; Névoa ultrassônica; Outro
tr: Yüz buharlama cihazı özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir yükseklikli stand; Aromaterapi haznesi; Bitkisel infüzyon haznesi; LED ışık terapisi; Büyüteçli lamba; Nano iyonik buhar; Ozon sterilizasyonu; Dokunmatik ekran kontrolleri; Ultrasonik buğu; Diğer
cs: Funkce obličejové napařovačky: Nastavitelný stojan; Aromaterapeutická komora; Komora na bylinné infuze; LED světelná terapie; Zvětšovací lampa; Nano iontová pára; Ozonová sterilizace; Dotykové ovládání; Ultrazvuková mlha; Jiné
th: คุณสมบัติเครื่องพ่นไอน้ำใบหน้า: ขาตั้งปรับความสูงได้; ช่องใส่น้ำหอม; ช่องใส่สมุนไพร; บำบัดด้วยแสง LED; โคมไฟแว่นขยาย; ไอน้ำนาโนไอออนิก; ฆ่าเชื้อด้วยโอโซน; ควบคุมด้วยหน้าจอสัมผัส; ละอองอัลตราโซนิก; อื่นๆ
nb: Ansiktsdamperfunksjoner: Justerbart høydestativ; Aromaterapikammer; Urteinfusjonskammer; LED-lysterapi; Forstørrelseslampe; Nano ionisk damp; Ozonsterilisering; Berøringsskjermkontroller; Ultralydtåke; Annet
vi: Tính năng máy xông hơi mặt: Giá đỡ điều chỉnh độ cao; Ngăn chứa tinh dầu; Ngăn chứa thảo dược; Liệu pháp ánh sáng LED; Đèn phóng đại; Hơi nước ion nano; Khử trùng ozone; Điều khiển màn hình cảm ứng; Sương siêu âm; Khác
zh-CN: 面部蒸汽机特点: 可调节高度支架; 香薰室; 草药浸泡室; LED 光疗; 放大灯; 纳米离子蒸汽; 臭氧杀菌; 触屏控制; 超声波喷雾; 其他
da: Ansigtsdamperfunktioner: Justerbart højdestativ; Aromaterapikammer; Urteinfusionskammer; LED-lysterapi; Forstørrelseslampe; Nano ionisk damp; Ozonsterilisering; Touchskærmkontroller; Ultralydståge; Andet
de: Funktionen des Gesichtsdampfers: Höhenverstellbarer Ständer; Aromatherapie-Kammer; Kräuteraufguss-Kammer; LED-Lichttherapie; Lupenlampe; Nano-ionischer Dampf; Ozon-Sterilisation; Touchscreen-Bedienung; Ultraschallnebel; Sonstiges
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ατμοποιητή προσώπου: Βάση ρυθμιζόμενου ύψους; Θάλαμος αρωματοθεραπείας; Θάλαμος έγχυσης βοτάνων; Θεραπεία με φως LED; Λυχνία μεγέθυνσης; Νανο-ιοντικός ατμός; Αποστείρωση με όζον; Έλεγχοι αφής; Υπερηχητική ομίχλη; Άλλο
pt-PT: Características do vaporizador facial: Suporte de altura ajustável; Câmara de aromaterapia; Câmara de infusão de ervas; Terapia de luz LED; Lâmpada de aumento; Vapor nano iónico; Esterilização por ozono; Controlos de ecrã tátil; Névoa ultrassónica; Outro
en: Facial steamer features: Adjustable height stand; Aromatherapy chamber; Herbal infusion chamber; LED light therapy; Magnifying lamp; Nano ionic steam; Ozone sterilization; Touchscreen controls; Ultrasonic mist; Other
hr-HR: Značajke parnog uređaja za lice: Podesivo postolje po visini; Komora za aromaterapiju; Komora za biljnu infuziju; LED svjetlosna terapija; Lampa s povećalom; Nano ionska para; Ozonska sterilizacija; Kontrole na dodir; Ultrazvučna maglica; Ostalo
lt-LT: Veido garintuvo savybės: Reguliuojamo aukščio stovas; Aromaterapijos kamera; Žolelių infuzijos kamera; LED šviesos terapija; Didinanti lempa; Nano joninis garas; Ozono sterilizacija; Jutiklinio ekrano valdymas; Ultragarsinis rūkas; Kita
sk-SK: Funkcie parného prístroja na tvár: Stojan s nastaviteľnou výškou; Aromaterapeutická komora; Komora na bylinný nálev; LED svetelná terapia; Zväčšovacia lampa; Nano iónová para; Ozónová sterilizácia; Dotykové ovládanie; Ultrazvuková hmla; Iné
ru: Характеристики паровой сауны для лица: Подставка с регулируемой высотой; Камера для ароматерапии; Камера для травяных настоев; LED-светотерапия; Увеличительная лампа; Наноионный пар; Озоновая стерилизация; Сенсорное управление; Ультразвуковой туман; Другой
es: Características del vaporizador facial: Soporte de altura ajustable; Cámara de aromaterapia; Cámara de infusión herbal; Terapia de luz LED; Lámpara de aumento; Vapor nano iónico; Esterilización con ozono; Controles de pantalla táctil; Niebla ultrasónica; Otros
sl-SI: Značilnosti parnega obraznega čistilca: Nastavljivo stojalo po višini; Komora za aromaterapijo; Komora za zeliščne poparke; LED svetlobna terapija; Povečevalna svetilka; Nano ionska para; Ozonska sterilizacija; Kontrole na dotik; Ultrazvočna meglica; Drugo
zh-TW: 臉部蒸氣機特色: 可調高度支架; 芳香療法室; 草藥浸泡室; LED 光療; 放大燈; 奈米離子蒸氣; 臭氧殺菌; 觸控螢幕控制; 超音波噴霧; 其他
ja: フェイシャルスチーマー機能: 高さ調節可能スタンド; アロマテラピーチャンバー; ハーブインフュージョンチャンバー; LEDライトセラピー; 拡大ランプ; ナノイオンスチーム; オゾン殺菌; タッチスクリーンコントロール; 超音波ミスト; その他